test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_VINIT_iitaawis_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     iitaawis: iitaawis
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1iitaawis: niiitaawis
     +Px2iitaawis: giiitaawis
     +Px3iitaawis: oiitaawis
     +PxIndefiitaawis: iiitaawis
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     iitaawis+Con: iitaawisenh
     iitaawis+Dim: iitaawisens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     iitaawis+Pos: iitaawisim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     iitaawis+Pej: iitaawisish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     iitaawis+Pos1Pl: iitaawisinaan
     iitaawis+PosObv: iitaawisini
     iitaawis+PosPl: iitaawisiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     iitaawis+Pret: iitaawisiban
     iitaawis+VocPl: iitaawis***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     iitaawis+Loc: iitaawising
     iitaawis+Obv: iitaawisan
     iitaawis+Pl: iitaawisag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1iitaawis+Con: niiitaawisenh
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim: niiitaawisens
     +Px2iitaawis+Con: giiitaawisenh
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim: giiitaawisens
     +Px3iitaawis+Con: oiitaawisenh
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim: oiitaawisens
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con: iiitaawisenh
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim: iiitaawisens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos: niiitaawisim
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos: giiitaawisim
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos: oiitaawisim
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos: iiitaawisim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej: niiitaawisish
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej: giiitaawisish
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej: oiitaawisish
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej: iiitaawisish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos1Pl: niiitaawisinaan
     +Px1iitaawis+PosObv: niiitaawisini
     +Px1iitaawis+PosPl: niiitaawisiwaa
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos1Pl: giiitaawisinaan
     +Px2iitaawis+PosObv: giiitaawisini
     +Px2iitaawis+PosPl: giiitaawisiwaa
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos1Pl: oiitaawisinaan
     +Px3iitaawis+PosObv: oiitaawisini
     +Px3iitaawis+PosPl: oiitaawisiwaa
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos1Pl: iiitaawisinaan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosObv: iiitaawisini
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl: iiitaawisiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1iitaawis+Pret: niiitaawisiban
     +Px1iitaawis+VocPl: niiitaawis***idig, idog***
     +Px2iitaawis+Pret: giiitaawisiban
     +Px2iitaawis+VocPl: giiitaawis***idig, idog***
     +Px3iitaawis+Pret: oiitaawisiban
     +Px3iitaawis+VocPl: oiitaawis***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pret: iiitaawisiban
     +PxIndefiitaawis+VocPl: iiitaawis***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1iitaawis+Loc: niiitaawising
     +Px1iitaawis+Obv: niiitaawisan
     +Px1iitaawis+Pl: niiitaawisag
     +Px2iitaawis+Loc: giiitaawising
     +Px2iitaawis+Obv: giiitaawisan
     +Px2iitaawis+Pl: giiitaawisag
     +Px3iitaawis+Loc: oiitaawising
     +Px3iitaawis+Obv: oiitaawisan
     +Px3iitaawis+Pl: oiitaawisag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Loc: iiitaawising
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Obv: iiitaawisan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pl: iiitaawisag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     iitaawis+Con+Pos: iitaawisenhim
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos: iitaawisensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     iitaawis+Con+Pej: iitaawisenhish
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej: iitaawisensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl: iitaawisenhinaan
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv: iitaawisenhini
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl: iitaawisenhiwaa
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl: iitaawisensinaan
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv: iitaawisensini
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl: iitaawisensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     iitaawis+Con+Pret: iitaawisenhiban
     iitaawis+Con+VocPl: iitaawisenh***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pret: iitaawisensiban
     iitaawis+Dim+VocPl: iitaawisens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Loc: iitaawisenhing
     iitaawis+Con+Obv: iitaawisenhan
     iitaawis+Con+Pl: iitaawisenhag
     iitaawis+Dim+Loc: iitaawisensing
     iitaawis+Dim+Obv: iitaawisensan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pl: iitaawisensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej: iitaawisimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl: iitaawisiminaan
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv: iitaawisimini
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl: iitaawisimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     iitaawis+Pos+Pret: iitaawisimiban
     iitaawis+Pos+VocPl: iitaawisim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     iitaawis+Pos+Loc: iitaawisiming
     iitaawis+Pos+Obv: iitaawisiman
     iitaawis+Pos+Pl: iitaawisimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl: iitaawisishinaan
     iitaawis+Pej+PosObv: iitaawisishini
     iitaawis+Pej+PosPl: iitaawisishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     iitaawis+Pej+Pret: iitaawisishiban
     iitaawis+Pej+VocPl: iitaawisish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     iitaawis+Pej+Loc: iitaawisishing
     iitaawis+Pej+Obv: iitaawisishan
     iitaawis+Pej+Pl: iitaawisishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     iitaawis+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisinaaniban
     iitaawis+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisinaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisiniiban
     iitaawis+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisiwaaiban
     iitaawis+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     iitaawis+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisinaaning
     iitaawis+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisinaanan
     iitaawis+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisinaanag
     iitaawis+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisiniing
     iitaawis+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisinian
     iitaawis+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisiniag
     iitaawis+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisiwaaing
     iitaawis+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisiwaaan
     iitaawis+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     iitaawis+Pret+Loc: iitaawisibaning
     iitaawis+Pret+Obv: iitaawisibanan
     iitaawis+Pret+Pl: iitaawisibanag
     iitaawis+VocPl+Loc: iitaawis***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+VocPl+Obv: iitaawis***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+VocPl+Pl: iitaawis***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Pos: niiitaawisenhim
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Pos: niiitaawisensim
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos: giiitaawisenhim
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos: giiitaawisensim
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos: oiitaawisenhim
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos: oiitaawisensim
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos: iiitaawisenhim
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos: iiitaawisensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Pej: niiitaawisenhish
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Pej: niiitaawisensish
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pej: giiitaawisenhish
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pej: giiitaawisensish
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pej: oiitaawisenhish
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pej: oiitaawisensish
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pej: iiitaawisenhish
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pej: iiitaawisensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl: niiitaawisenhinaan
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+PosObv: niiitaawisenhini
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+PosPl: niiitaawisenhiwaa
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl: niiitaawisensinaan
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+PosObv: niiitaawisensini
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+PosPl: niiitaawisensiwaa
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl: giiitaawisenhinaan
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+PosObv: giiitaawisenhini
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+PosPl: giiitaawisenhiwaa
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl: giiitaawisensinaan
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+PosObv: giiitaawisensini
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+PosPl: giiitaawisensiwaa
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl: oiitaawisenhinaan
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+PosObv: oiitaawisenhini
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+PosPl: oiitaawisenhiwaa
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl: oiitaawisensinaan
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+PosObv: oiitaawisensini
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+PosPl: oiitaawisensiwaa
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl: iiitaawisenhinaan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+PosObv: iiitaawisenhini
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+PosPl: iiitaawisenhiwaa
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl: iiitaawisensinaan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+PosObv: iiitaawisensini
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+PosPl: iiitaawisensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Pret: niiitaawisenhiban
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+VocPl: niiitaawisenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Pret: niiitaawisensiban
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+VocPl: niiitaawisens***idig, idog***
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pret: giiitaawisenhiban
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+VocPl: giiitaawisenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pret: giiitaawisensiban
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+VocPl: giiitaawisens***idig, idog***
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pret: oiitaawisenhiban
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+VocPl: oiitaawisenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pret: oiitaawisensiban
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+VocPl: oiitaawisens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pret: iiitaawisenhiban
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+VocPl: iiitaawisenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pret: iiitaawisensiban
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+VocPl: iiitaawisens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Loc: niiitaawisenhing
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Obv: niiitaawisenhan
     +Px1iitaawis+Con+Pl: niiitaawisenhag
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Loc: niiitaawisensing
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Obv: niiitaawisensan
     +Px1iitaawis+Dim+Pl: niiitaawisensag
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Loc: giiitaawisenhing
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Obv: giiitaawisenhan
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pl: giiitaawisenhag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Loc: giiitaawisensing
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Obv: giiitaawisensan
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pl: giiitaawisensag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Loc: oiitaawisenhing
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Obv: oiitaawisenhan
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pl: oiitaawisenhag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Loc: oiitaawisensing
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Obv: oiitaawisensan
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pl: oiitaawisensag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Loc: iiitaawisenhing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Obv: iiitaawisenhan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pl: iiitaawisenhag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Loc: iiitaawisensing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Obv: iiitaawisensan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pl: iiitaawisensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+Pej: niiitaawisimish
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+Pej: giiitaawisimish
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+Pej: oiitaawisimish
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+Pej: iiitaawisimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl: niiitaawisiminaan
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+PosObv: niiitaawisimini
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+PosPl: niiitaawisimiwaa
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl: giiitaawisiminaan
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+PosObv: giiitaawisimini
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+PosPl: giiitaawisimiwaa
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl: oiitaawisiminaan
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+PosObv: oiitaawisimini
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+PosPl: oiitaawisimiwaa
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl: iiitaawisiminaan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+PosObv: iiitaawisimini
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+PosPl: iiitaawisimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+Pret: niiitaawisimiban
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+VocPl: niiitaawisim***idig, idog***
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+Pret: giiitaawisimiban
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+VocPl: giiitaawisim***idig, idog***
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+Pret: oiitaawisimiban
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+VocPl: oiitaawisim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+Pret: iiitaawisimiban
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+VocPl: iiitaawisim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+Loc: niiitaawisiming
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+Obv: niiitaawisiman
     +Px1iitaawis+Pos+Pl: niiitaawisimag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+Loc: giiitaawisiming
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+Obv: giiitaawisiman
     +Px2iitaawis+Pos+Pl: giiitaawisimag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+Loc: oiitaawisiming
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+Obv: oiitaawisiman
     +Px3iitaawis+Pos+Pl: oiitaawisimag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+Loc: iiitaawisiming
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+Obv: iiitaawisiman
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pos+Pl: iiitaawisimag
     
